en: Horse Boots & Leg Wraps
xx: Horse Boots & Leg Wraps
cs: Koňské podkovy a bandáže
da: Støvler og benvarmere til heste
de: Hufglocken & Gamaschen
es: Botas y vendas para protección de caballos
fr: Guêtres et cloches pour chevaux, Guètres de sport
it: Stivali e parastinchi da equitazione
ja: 馬用ブーツ・レッグラップ
nl: Paardenschoenen en beenkappen
no: Hovkopper og bandasjer
pl: Buty i ocieplacze dla koni
pt: Proteção para patas e botas para cavalos
ru: Денниковые бинты и защита ног
sv: Hästboots och benlindor
tr: At Nalları ve Bacak Sargıları

en: Horse Feed
xx: Horse Feed
cs: Krmivo pro koně
da: Hestefoder
de: Pferdefutter
es: Pienso para caballos
fr: Aliments pour chevaux
it: Mangime per cavalli
ja: 馬用飼料
nl: Paardenvoer
no: Hestefôr
pl: Karma dla koni
pt: Ração para cavalos
ru: Корм для лошадей
sv: Hästfoder
tr: At Besleme

en: Horse Fly Masks
xx: Horse Fly Masks
cs: Koňské masky proti hmyzu
da: Fluemasker til heste
de: Fliegenmasken
es: Máscaras antimoscas para caballos
fr: Masques anti-mouches pour chevaux
it: Maschere per mosche per cavalli
ja: 馬用フライマスク
nl: Vliegenmaskers voor paarden
no: Kleggmasker for hest
pl: Maski dla koni przeciw owadom
pt: Máscaras antimoscas para cavalos
ru: Москитные маски для лошадей
sv: Flugmasker
tr: At Sinek Maskeleri

en: Horse Grooming
xx: Horse Grooming
cs: Péče o koně
da: Hestepleje
de: Pferdehaarpflege
es: Acicalamiento de caballos
fr: Articles de toilettage pour chevaux
it: Strigliatura cavalli
ja: 馬用グルーミング用品
nl: Paardenverzorging
no: Hestestell
pl: Artykuły do pielęgnacji koni
pt: Grooming de cavalos
ru: Средства для ухода за лошадьми
sv: Hästryktning
tr: At Tımarlama

en: Horse Clippers & Trimmers
xx: Horse Clippers & Trimmers
cs: Zastřihovače a trimovače pro koně
da: Hesteklippere og -trimmere
de: Pferdeschermaschinen
es: Cortapelos para caballos
fr: Tondeuses pour chevaux
it: Forbici e taglia peli per cavalli
ja: 馬用バリカン
nl: Paardentondeuses
no: Hesteklippere og -trimmere
pl: Nożyce i trymery dla koni
pt: Tosadores e aparadores para cavalos
ru: Триммеры и машинки для стрижки лошадей
sv: Hästklippning och trimning
tr: Toynak Makasları ve Kırpma Makineleri

en: Horse Grooming Combs\, Brushes & Mitts
xx: Horse Grooming Combs\, Brushes & Mitts
cs: Hříbla\, kartáče a rukavice pro péči o koně
da: Kamme\, børster og handsker til strigling
de: Kämme\, Bürsten & Striegel
es: Peines\, cepillos y guantes para acicalar caballos
fr: Peignes\, brosses et gants de toilettage
it: Pettini\, spazzole e guanti per la strigliatura dei cavalli
ja: 馬用グルーミングコーム・ブラシ
nl: Kammen\, borstels en handschoenen voor paardenverzorging
no: Kammer\, børster og hansker for strigling
pl: Rękawice\, szczotki i grzebienie do czyszczenia koni
pt: Pentes\, escovas e luvas para cuidados com cavalos
ru: Щетки\, гребни и варежки для чистки лошадей
sv: Ryktborstar och mankammar för hästar
tr: At Tımar Tarakları\, Fırçaları ve Eldivenleri

en: Horse Treats
xx: Horse Treats
cs: Odměny pro koně
da: Godbidder til heste
de: Leckerli für Pferde
es: Golosinas para caballos
fr: Friandises pour chevaux
it: Ricompense per cavalli
ja: 馬用おやつ
nl: Paardensnoepjes
no: Hestesnacks
pl: Przysmaki dla koni
pt: Petiscos para cavalos
ru: Лакомства для лошадей
sv: Hästgodis
tr: At Bakımı

en: Horse Vitamins & Supplements
xx: Horse Vitamins & Supplements
cs: Vitamíny a doplňky stravy pro koně
da: Vitaminer og kosttilskud til heste
de: Vitamine & Futterergänzungsmittel für Pferde
es: Vitaminas y suplementos para caballos
fr: Vitamines et compléments alimentaires pour chevaux
it: Vitamine e supplementi per cavalli
ja: 馬用ビタミン剤・サプリメント
nl: Vitaminen en supplementen voor paarden
no: Vitaminer og kosttilskudd til hester
pl: Witaminy i suplementy dla koni
pt: Suplementos e vitaminas para cavalos
ru: Витамины и добавки для лошадей
sv: Vitaminer och kosttillskott för hästar
tr: At Vitaminleri ve Takviyeleri

en: Horse Wormers
xx: Horse Wormers
cs: Odčervovací přípravky pro koně
da: Ormekure til heste
de: Wurmkur für Pferde
es: Antihelmínticos para caballos
fr: Vermifuges pour chevaux
it: Vermifughi per cavalli
ja: 馬用駆虫薬
nl: Ontwormingsmiddelen voor paarden
no: Ormekurer for hester
pl: Preparaty dla koni przeciw pasożytom
pt: Vermífugos para cavalos
ru: Противоглистные средства для лошадей
sv: Avmaskningsmedel för hästar
tr: At Wormerleri

en: Horse Tack
xx: Horse Tack
cs: Jezdecké potřeby pro koně
da: Hesteudstyr
de: Sattel- & Zaumzeug
es: Arreos para caballos
fr: Harnachement
it: Finimenti per cavalli
ja: 馬具
nl: Paardentuig
no: Hestetilbehør
pl: Rząd koński
pt: Equipamentos para cavalos
ru: Сбруя
sv: Ridtyg
tr: Nal Çivileri

en: Bridle Bits
xx: Bridle Bits
cs: Udidla
da: Bidsler
de: Trensen
es: Bocados para caballos
fr: Mors
it: Morsi da equitazione
ja: ハミ
nl: Paardenbitten
no: Bitt til hodelag
pl: Wędzidła
pt: Freios para cavalos
ru: Удила
sv: Tränsbett
tr: Gemler

en: Bridles
xx: Bridles
cs: Uzdy a uzdečky
da: Hovedtøj
de: Zaumzeug
es: Cabezadas
fr: Brides
it: Briglie
ja: 頭絡
nl: Hoofdstellen
no: Hodelag
pl: Uzdy
pt: Bridas
ru: Уздечки
sv: Tränsar
tr: Yularlar

en: Cinches
xx: Cinches
cs: Sedlové řemeny
da: Sadelgjorde
de: Sattelgurte
es: Cinchas
fr: Sous-ventrière
it: Cinghie
ja: 鞍帯
nl: Zadelriemen
no: Salgjorder
pl: Popręgi
pt: Cilhas para cavalos
ru: Подпруги
sv: Sadelgjordar
tr: At Kolanları

en: Horse Halters
xx: Horse Halters
cs: Koňské ohlávky
da: Grimer
de: Halfter
es: Cabestros para caballos
fr: Licous pour chevaux
it: Cavezze per cavalli
ja: 馬用ホルター
nl: Paardenhalsters
no: Hestegrimer
pl: Kantary dla koni
pt: Cabrestos para cavalos
ru: Недоуздки для лошадей
sv: Grimmor för hästar
tr: At Yularları

en: Horse Harnesses
xx: Horse Harnesses
cs: Postroje
da: Seletøj til heste
de: Pferdegeschirr
es: Arneses para caballos
fr: Harnais pour chevaux
it: Briglie da equitazione
ja: 馬車ハーネス
nl: Paardenharnassen
no: Seletøy
pl: Uprzęże jeździeckie
pt: Arreios para cavalos
ru: Упряжь
sv: Hästselar
tr: At Koşum Takımları

en: Horse Leads
xx: Horse Leads
cs: Vodítka pro koně
da: Træktov
de: Pferdeleinen
es: Cuerdas para caballos
fr: Rênes pour chevaux
it: Lunghine per cavalli
ja: 馬用リードロープ
nl: Paardenlijnen
no: Ledetau
pl: Uwiązy dla koni
pt: Cordas e correias para cavalos
ru: Поводья для лошадей
sv: Ledrep för hästar
tr: At Yular Kayışları

en: Reins
xx: Reins
cs: Otěže
da: Hestetømmer
de: Zügel
es: Riendas
fr: Rênes
it: Redini
ja: 手綱
nl: Teugels
no: Tømmer
pl: Lejce
pt: Rédeas para cavalos
ru: Поводья
sv: Tyglar
tr: Dizginler

en: Saddles
xx: Saddles
cs: Sedla
da: Sadler
de: Sättel
es: Monturas
fr: Selles
it: Selle
ja: 鞍
nl: Zadels
no: Saler
pl: Siodła
pt: Selas
ru: Сёдла
sv: Sadlar
tr: Eyerler

en: Stirrups
xx: Stirrups
cs: Třmeny
da: Stigbøjler
de: Steigbügel
es: Estribos
fr: Étriers
it: Staffe
ja: 鐙
nl: Stijgbeugels
no: Stigbøyler
pl: Strzemiona
pt: Estribos
ru: Стремена
sv: Stigbyglar
tr: Üzengiler

en: Horse Tack Accessories
xx: Horse Tack Accessories
cs: Příslušenství pro koně
da: Tilbehør til rideudstyr
de: Zubehör für Sattel & Zaumzeug
es: Accesorios para riendas de caballos
fr: Accessoires de harnachement pour chevaux
it: Accessori per finimenti per cavalli
ja: 馬具関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor paardentuig
no: Tilbehør til seletøy
pl: Akcesoria do uprzęży jeździeckich
pt: Equipamento para montaria
ru: Принадлежности для сбруи
sv: Tillbehör till hästutrustning
tr: At Eyer Takımı Aksesuarları